Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.31
Civil fines; distribution; collection
procedure.

(1)
All civil fines collected pursuant to the Nebraska Real Estate License Act
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(2) Any civil fine imposed
pursuant to the act which remains unpaid for more than sixty days shall constitute
a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be recovered by the Attorney General,
along with reasonable attorney's fees and court costs, in a proper form of
action in the name of the state in the district court of the county in which
the violator resides. The commission shall consider such debt to be grounds
for denial, refusal to renew, or refusal to reinstate a license under the
act or grounds for additional disciplinary action by the commission.

Laws 2009, LB30, § 10.